Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-224.06
Domestic assessment association; bulk reinsurance; contract.

Any domestic assessment association, which has accumulated and maintains the same reserve for liabilities that is required of a mutual company transacting the same kind or kinds of business, and which has a surplus or contingency funds equal to, or in excess of the surplus required of a mutual company transacting the same kind or kinds of business, may in any contract of reinsurance or bulk reinsurance, agree to limit its assessments to the premium stated in the policies issued by the ceding company.

Laws 1957, c. 180, § 6, p. 622.